Massachusetts, session 194th, SD3404.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 81C of chapter 112 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the first sentence the following 2
sentences:- An approved school’s curriculum shall include education on inflammatory breast
cancer, which shall be developed in consultation with experts on the study, diagnosis and
treatment of inflammatory breast cancer. Approved schools may receive funds from private
sources for costs related to the inflammatory breast cancer education component.
SECTION 2. This act shall be known as “Marnie’s Law.”
of 1